Utah statutes.
31A-36-118.   Criminal penalties and restitution.

(1) A person subject to this chapter is subject to:

(a) Section 31A-2-308 for an administrative violation of this title;

(b)  prosecution under Section 76-6-412 for a criminal activity involving a life settlement; or

(c)  prosecution under Section 31A-31-103 for insurance fraud involving a life settlement.

(2)  A person found to be in violation of this chapter may:

(a)  be ordered to pay restitution to persons aggrieved by the violation;

(b)  be ordered to pay a forfeiture;

(c)  be imprisoned if found guilty of a criminal law by a court of competent jurisdiction; and

(d)  be subject to a combination of the penalties described in this Subsection (2).

(3)  Except for a fraudulent act committed by an owner, this section does not apply to the owner.

